Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202629-4908
Rights in addition to collective-bargaining agreements or other law.

The rights enumerated in sections 29-4901 to 29-4908 are in addition to any other rights granted pursuant to a collective-bargaining agreement or other law.

Laws 2026, LB965, § 29.
October 1, 2026